Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2002
County officers; removal by judicial proceedings; jurisdiction of district court.

Any person may make such charge, and the district court shall have exclusive original jurisdiction thereof by summons.

R.S.1866, c. 45, § 2, p. 298;

Laws 1905, c. 51, § 1, p. 297;

R.S.1913, § 5699;

C.S.1922, § 5029;

C.S.1929, § 26-1702;

R.S.1943, § 23-2002.